Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SANCTIONS WHEN DISCRIMINATION IN EDUCATION IS FOUND
SECTION 1.  ORS 659.855 is amended to read:
659.855. (1) Any public elementary or secondary school or program determined by  the Super-
intendent of Public Instruction to be in noncompliance with  provisions of this section and ORS
332.505 (2), 659.850 and 659.852 shall be  subject to appropriate sanctions, as established by rule
of the State Board of Education,  which may include :
(a) Entering an order for  the school or program to adopt or revise a policy, undergo
training, publicly disseminate information or receive technical assistance.
(b) For a violation of ORS 659.850 involving a student when the discrimination  caused the
student to  miss an educational or extracurricular activity, not have full access to educa-
tional services or be treated differently with respect to any aid, benefit or service  otherwise
available to students:
(A) Providing the student with access to  the missed educational or extracurricular ac-
tivity, full access to the educational service or the  difference in the aid, benefit or service;
or
(B) Reimbursing the student or the student’s parent or legal guardian for  any reasonable
costs incurred  in obtaining a comparable educational or extracurricular activity, receiving
full access to comparable educational services  or receiving comparable aid, benefits or ser-
vices.
(c) Withholding of all or part of state funding[ , as established  by rule of the State Board of Ed-
ucation].
(2) Any public community college determined by  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission
to be in noncompliance with provisions  of ORS 659.850 and 659.852 and this section shall be subject
to appropriate sanctions, which may include withholding of  all or part of state funding, as estab-
lished by rule of the commission.
(3) Any public university listed in ORS  352.002 determined by the Higher Education Coordinat-
ing Commission to be in noncompliance  with provisions of ORS 659.850 and 659.852 and this section
Enrolled Senate Bill 867 (SB 867-A) Page 1
shall be subject to appropriate sanctions, which may include withholding of all  or part of state
funding, as established by rule of the commission.
(4) Any public charter  school determined by the sponsor of the school or the superintendent to
be in noncompliance with  the provisions of this section and ORS 332.505 (2), 659.850 and 659.852
shall be subject to appropriate sanctions,  which may include the withholding of all or part of state
funding by the sponsor or superintendent, as established by rule of the State Board of Education.
ODE AUTHORITY RELATED TO INVESTIGATIONS OF ABUSE AND
SEXUAL CONDUCT
SECTION 2.  ORS 339.370, as amended by section 1, chapter 45, Oregon Laws 2024,  is amended
to read:
339.370. As used in ORS 339.370 to 339.400:
(1) “Abuse” has the meaning given that term in ORS 419B.005.
(2) “Agent” means  a person acting as an agent for an education provider in a manner that re-
quires the person to have direct, unsupervised contact with students.
(3) “Commission licensee” has the meaning given that term in ORS 342.120.
(4) “Contractor” means a person  providing services to an education provider under a contract
in a manner that requires the person to have direct, unsupervised contact with students.
(5)(a) “Education provider” means:
(A) A school district, as defined in ORS 332.002.
(B) The Oregon School for the Deaf.
(C) An educational program under the Youth Corrections Education Program.
(D) A public charter school, as defined in ORS 338.005.
(E) An education service district, as defined in ORS 334.003.
(F) An approved recovery school, as defined in ORS 336.680.
(G) Any state-operated program that provides educational services to students.
(H) A private school.
(b) “Education provider” does not include:
(A) The Oregon Youth Authority;
(B) The Department of Corrections; [ or]
(C) The Department of Education, except when functioning as an education provider on  behalf
of the Oregon School for the Deaf[ .]; or
(D) An education provider that only serves students  who have not yet entered
kindergarten, except when the education provider is under the direct control of an  education
provider for students in any grade from kindergarten through grade 12.
(6) “Investigation” means a detailed inquiry  into the factual allegations of a report of suspected
abuse or suspected sexual conduct that:
(a) Is based on interviews with the person who initiated the  report, the person who may have
been subjected to abuse or sexual conduct, witnesses  and the person who is the subject of the re-
port; and
(b) Results in a finding that the report:
(A) Is a substantiated report;
(B) Cannot be substantiated; or
(C) Is not a report of abuse or sexual conduct.
(7) “Law enforcement agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 419B.005.
(8) “Licensed administrator” means a person who is employed  as an administrator of an educa-
tion provider and who:
(a) Holds an administrative license issued by the Teacher Standards  and Practices Commission
under ORS 342.125 (3)(f) or (g); or
Enrolled Senate Bill 867 (SB 867-A) Page 2
(b) Does not hold an administrative license issued by the  commission because the person is
employed by an education provider that does  not require administrators to be licensed by the com-
mission.
(9) “Private  school” means a school that provides to students instructional programs that are
not limited solely to dancing, drama, music, religious or athletic instruction.
(10) “School board” means the entity charged with adopting policies for an education provider.
(11) “School employee” means an employee of an education provider.
(12)(a) “Sexual conduct” means verbal or physical conduct or verbal,  written or electronic
communications by a school employee, a contractor, an agent or a volunteer that involve a  student
and that are:
(A) Sexual advances or requests for sexual favors directed toward the student; or
(B) Of a sexual nature  that are directed toward the student or that have the effect of unrea-
sonably interfering with the student’s educational  performance, or of creating an intimidating or
hostile educational environment.
(b) “Sexual conduct” does not include:
(A) Touching or other physical contact:
(i) That is necessitated by the  nature of the school employee’s job duties or by the services re-
quired to be provided by the contractor, agent or volunteer; and
(ii) For which there is no sexual intent.
(B) Verbal, written or  electronic communications that are provided as part of an education
program that meets state educational standards or a policy approved by the school board.
(C) Conduct or communications described in paragraph (a)  of this subsection if the school em-
ployee, contractor, agent or volunteer is also a student and the conduct or communications:
(i) Arise out of a consensual relationship between students;
(ii) Do not create an intimidating or hostile educational environment; and
(iii) Are not prohibited by law,  any policies of the education provider or any applicable em-
ployment agreements.
(13) “Student” means any person:
(a) Who is:
(A) In any grade from prekindergarten through grade 12; or
(B) Twenty-one years of age or younger  and receiving educational or related services from an
education provider that is not a post-secondary institution of education; or
(b) Who was previously known as a student by the person engaging in sexual  conduct and who
left school or graduated from high school within one calendar year prior to the sexual conduct.
(14) “Substantiated report” means  a report of abuse or sexual conduct that a law enforcement
agency, the Department of Human Services, the Teacher  Standards and Practices Commission, the
Department of Education or an education provider has reasonable  cause to believe, based on the
available evidence after conducting an investigation, is founded.
(15) “Volunteer” means a person acting as  a volunteer for an education provider in a manner
that requires the person to have direct, unsupervised contact with students.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 339.391 is amended to read:
339.391. (1)(a) When the Department of Education  receives a report of suspected sexual conduct
that may have been committed by a school employee, contractor, agent  or volunteer that is not a
commission licensee, the  department shall immediately initiate an investigation.  The department
may investigate and make a final determination for any person who provided services  as a
school employee, a contractor, an agent or a  volunteer within two calendar years prior to
when the suspected sexual conduct was committed.
(b) An investigation and final determination related to  the report received under paragraph (a)
of this subsection must be completed and notification of the final determination  must be made to the
education provider within 90  calendar days following the date on which the report was filed with
the department.
Enrolled Senate Bill 867 (SB 867-A) Page 3
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (b) of this subsection,  the prescribed timeline for an investigation
and final determination may be extended if the department determines that, for good  cause, a longer
period of time is necessary.
(2) The department shall appoint an investigator and shall furnish the investigator with  appro-
priate professional and other  special assistance reasonably required to conduct an investigation. An
investigator appointed under this subsection is empowered to:
(a) Issue subpoenas to require the attendance of witnesses or the production of documents;
(b) Subpoena witnesses; and
(c) Swear witnesses and compel obedience in the same manner as provided  under ORS 183.440
(2).
(3)(a) Following the completion of an investigation, the Department of Education shall notify:
(A) The person charged;
(B) The student, the  student’s parents or legal guardians, or both the student and the student’s
parents or legal guardians;  and
(C) The education provider[ ;].
[(D) The person who provided the report of suspected sexual  conduct, if known by the department;
and]
[(E) For a substantiated report only, any regulatory board that: ]
[(i) Is not the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission; and ]
[(ii) The department knows licensed, registered, certified or otherwise  authorized the school em-
ployee, contractor, agent or volunteer to practice a profession or to provide professional services. ]
(b) The notification  required under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall include the following
information as allowed by state and federal law:
(A) The statutory authority of the department to conduct the investigation;
(B) The procedural background for the investigation;
(C) The legal standards and arguments used for the investigation;
(D) The department’s findings of fact from the investigation;
(E) The department’s final determination based on the investigation; and
(F) The right to an appeal, as provided by subsection (5) of this section.
(c) Following the completion of an investigation, the department shall:
(A) Inform the person who provided the report of suspected sexual conduct, if known  by
the department, whether the department found that the report:
(i) Is a substantiated report;
(ii) Cannot be substantiated; or
(iii) Is not a report of sexual conduct.
(B) For a  substantiated report only, inform a regulatory board that the department found
that the report is substantiated, if the regulatory board:
(i) Is not the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission; and
(ii) The department  knows that the regulatory board licensed, registered, certified or
otherwise authorized the school employee, contractor, agent or volunteer  to practice a pro-
fession or to provide professional services.
(4)(a) Except as provided  in paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection and subsection (3) of this
section, the documents and materials used in the investigation undertaken  under this section, and
the report related to the investigation, are confidential and not subject to public inspection.
(b) Documents, materials  and reports that are confidential under paragraph (a) of this subsection
may be disclosed to an entity listed in paragraph (c) of this subsection, or  in the manner described
in subsection (3)  of this section, only as provided by this section and by rules adopted by the State
Board of Education. The person or entity that receives documents,  materials or reports must main-
tain their confidentiality unless  disclosure is allowed or required under this section or other state
or federal law.
(c) To the extent allowed by state and federal law, the department shall  make available any
documents, materials and reports that are confidential under paragraph (a) of this subsection to:
Enrolled Senate Bill 867 (SB 867-A) Page 4
(A) A law enforcement agency or the Department  of Human Services if necessary to conduct
an investigation under ORS 419B.005 to 419B.050;
(B) The Teacher Standards and Practices Commission if necessary for the commission to conduct
an investigation under ORS 339.390 or 342.176; and
(C) An education  provider if necessary for the education provider to take any disciplinary action
or changes in the employment relationship  or duties of the school employee, contractor, agent or
volunteer.
(d) The Department of Education shall retain documents and  materials related to any report
received under this section for a period of 75 years.
(5) A person  who is the subject of an investigation under this section may appeal a final deter-
mination that the report related to the investigation  is a substantiated report as a contested case
under ORS chapter 183.
(6) The State Board  of Education shall adopt any rules necessary for the administration of this
section.
SECTION 4.  ORS 419B.035, as amended by section 68, chapter 73, Oregon Laws 2024,  is
amended to read:
419B.035. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of ORS 192.001  to 192.170, 192.210 to 192.478 and
192.610 to 192.810 relating to confidentiality and accessibility for public inspection of public records
and public documents, reports and records compiled under the provisions of  ORS 419B.010 to
419B.050 are confidential and may not be disclosed except as provided in this  section. The Depart-
ment of Human Services shall make the records available to:
(a) Any law enforcement agency or a child abuse registry in any other state for the  purpose of
subsequent investigation of child abuse;
(b) Any physician, physician associate licensed under ORS  677.505 to 677.525 or nurse practi-
tioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390, at the request of the  physician, physician associate
or nurse practitioner,  regarding any child brought to the physician, physician associate or nurse
practitioner or coming before the physician, physician associate or nurse practitioner for examina-
tion, care or treatment;
(c) Attorneys of record for the child or child’s parent or guardian in any juvenile court  pro-
ceeding;
(d) Citizen review boards established by the  Judicial Department for the purpose of periodically
reviewing the status  of children, youths and adjudicated youths under the jurisdiction of the juvenile
court under ORS 419B.100 and 419C.005. Citizen review boards may make such  records available to
participants in case reviews;
(e) A court appointed special advocate in  any juvenile court proceeding in which it is alleged
that a child has been subjected to child abuse or neglect;
(f) The Department of  Early Learning and Care for the purpose of carrying out the functions
of the department, including  the certification, registration or regulation of child care facilities and
child care providers and the administration of enrollment in the Central Background Registry;
(g) The Office of Children’s Advocate;
(h) The Teacher Standards  and Practices Commission for investigations conducted under ORS
339.390 or 342.176 involving any child or any student;
(i) Any person, upon request to  the Department of Human Services, if the reports or records
requested regard an incident in which a child, as the result of abuse, died or suffered serious phys-
ical injury as defined in ORS 161.015.  Reports or records disclosed under this paragraph must be
disclosed in accordance with ORS 192.311 to 192.478;
(j) The Department of Early Learning  and Care for purposes of applications described in ORS
329A.030 (11)(c)(G) to (J);
(k) With respect to a report of abuse occurring  at a school or in an educational setting that
involves a child with a disability, Disability Rights Oregon;
(L) The Department of Education for purposes of investigations conducted under ORS 339.391;
(m) An education provider for the purpose of making determinations under ORS 339.388; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 867 (SB 867-A) Page 5
(n) A national nonprofit organization designated by the  Department of Human Services that
provides assistance with  locating, recovering or providing services to children or youth determined
by the department to be missing.
(2)(a) When disclosing reports and records pursuant to subsection (1)(i) of this section, the De-
partment of Human Services may exempt from disclosure the names, addresses and other identifying
information about other children, witnesses, victims or other persons  named in the report or record
if the department determines, in written findings,  that the safety or well-being of a person named in
the report or  record may be jeopardized by disclosure of the names, addresses or other identifying
information, and if that concern outweighs the public’s  interest in the disclosure of that information.
(b) If the Department of Human Services does not  have a report or record of abuse regarding
a child who,  as the result of abuse, died or suffered serious physical injury as defined in ORS
161.015, the department may disclose that information.
(3) The Department of Human Services may make reports and records compiled under  the pro-
visions of ORS 419B.010 to 419B.050 available to any person, administrative  hearings officer, court,
agency, organization or other entity when the department determines that such disclosure is neces-
sary to administer its child welfare services and is in the best interests of the affected  child, or that
such disclosure is necessary to  investigate, prevent or treat child abuse and neglect, to protect
children from abuse and neglect or for research when the  Director of Human Services gives prior
written approval. The Department of Human Services shall adopt rules setting  forth the procedures
by which it will make the  disclosures authorized under this subsection or subsection (1) or (2) of this
section. The name, address and other identifying information  about the person who made the report
may not be disclosed pursuant to this subsection and subsection (1) of this section.
(4) A law  enforcement agency may make reports and records compiled under the provisions of
ORS 419B.010 to 419B.050 available to other law enforcement agencies, district attorneys, city at-
torneys with criminal prosecutorial functions and the Attorney General when the law enforcement
agency determines that disclosure  is necessary for the investigation or enforcement of laws relating
to child abuse and  neglect or necessary to determine a claim for crime victim compensation under
ORS 147.005 to 147.367.
(5)(a) A law enforcement agency,  upon completing an investigation and closing the file in a
specific case relating to child abuse or neglect, shall make reports and records in the  case available
upon request to:
(A) Any law enforcement agency or community corrections agency  in this state, to the Depart-
ment of Corrections, to the Oregon Youth Authority or to the  State Board of Parole and Post-Prison
Supervision for the purpose of managing and supervising offenders in  custody or on probation,
parole, post-prison supervision or other form of conditional or supervised release; [ and]
(B) The  Teacher Standards and Practices Commission for investigations conducted under ORS
339.390 and 342.176[.]; and
(C) The Department of Education for investigations conducted under ORS 339.391.
(b) A  law enforcement agency may make reports and records compiled under the provisions of
ORS 419B.010 to 419B.050 available to the Oregon Youth Authority, the Teacher  Standards and
Practices Commission for investigations conducted under ORS  339.390 and 342.176, the Department
of Education for investigations conducted under  ORS 339.391,  law enforcement, community
corrections, corrections or parole agencies in an open case when the law enforcement agency de-
termines that the disclosure will not interfere with an ongoing investigation in the case.
(c) The name, address and other identifying information about  the person who made the report
may not be disclosed under this subsection or subsection (6)(b) of this section.
(6)(a) Any  record made available to a law enforcement agency or community corrections agency
in this state, to the Department of Corrections, the Oregon Youth Authority, the State Board  of
Parole and Post-Prison Supervision , [ or] the Teacher Standards and  Practices Commission  or the
Department of Education  or to a physician, physician associate or nurse  practitioner in this state,
as authorized by  subsections (1) to (5) of this section, shall be kept confidential by the agency, de-
partment, board, commission, physician, physician associate or nurse practitioner.  Any  record  or
Enrolled Senate Bill 867 (SB 867-A) Page 6
report disclosed by the Department of Human Services to  other persons or entities pursuant to
subsections (1) and (3) of this section shall be kept confidential.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection:
(A) A law enforcement agency, a community corrections agency, the Department of  Corrections,
the Oregon Youth Authority  and the State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision may disclose
records made available to them under subsection (5) of this section  to each other, to law enforce-
ment, community corrections, corrections and parole agencies of other states and to authorized
treatment providers  for the purpose of managing and supervising offenders in custody or on pro-
bation, parole, post-prison supervision or other form of conditional or supervised release.
(B) The Department of Corrections and the Oregon  Youth Authority may disclose records made
available to them under subsection  (5) of this section regarding a person in the custody of the De-
partment of Corrections or the Oregon Youth Authority to  each other, to the court, to the district
attorney and to the person’s attorney for the purpose of the person’s hearing under  ORS 420A.200
to 420A.206.
(C) A person may disclose records made available  to the person under subsection (1)(i) of this
section if the records are disclosed for the purpose of advancing the public interest.
(7) Except as provided by ORS  339.389, an officer or employee of the Department of Human
Services or of a law enforcement  agency or any person or entity to whom disclosure is made pur-
suant to subsections (1) to (6) of this section may not release any information not authorized  by
subsections (1) to (6) of this section.
(8) A record of sexual orientation, gender identity or gender expression, as defined  in ORS
409.225, is exempt from disclosure under subsection (1) of this section unless:
(a) The department determines, in written findings, that failure to disclose the record is  rea-
sonably likely to jeopardize the child’s safety or well-being;
(b) The department determines, in written findings,  that disclosure of the record is necessary to
provide services to the child or the child’s family; or
(c) The child consents to the disclosure.
(9) As used in this section,  “law enforcement agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS
181A.010.
(10) A person who violates subsection (6)(a) or (7) of this section commits a Class A violation.
MISCELLANEOUS
SECTION 5.
The unit captions used in this 2025 Act are provided only for the convenience
of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or express any  leg-
islative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
Enrolled Senate Bill 867 (SB 867-A) Page 7
Passed by Senate March 4, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 12, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 867 (SB 867-A) Page 8